Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2911
Contracts; affidavit required; rescission.

Any contract
between the state or a political subdivision and a contractor shall require
that each contractor who performs construction or delivery service pursuant
to the contract submit to the state or political subdivision an affidavit
attesting that (1) each individual performing services for such contractor
is properly classified under the Employee Classification Act, (2) such contractor
has completed a federal I-9 immigration form and has such form on file for
each employee performing services, (3) such contractor has complied with section
4-114, (4) such contractor has no reasonable basis to believe that any individual
performing services for such contractor is an undocumented worker, and (5)
as of the time of the contract, such contractor is not barred from contracting
with the state or any political subdivision pursuant to section 48-2912. Such
contract shall also require that the contractor follow the provisions of the
Employee Classification Act. A violation of the act by a contractor is grounds
for rescission of the contract by the state or political subdivision.

Laws 2010, LB563, § 11.